fst/morphology/affixes/verb_prefixes.lexc
LEXICON VerbArgClass
@P.class.II@ VerbOrder ;
@P.class.AI@ VerbOrder ;
@P.class.TI@ VerbOrder ;
@P.class.TA@ VerbOrder ;

LEXICON VerbOrder
@P.order.Ind@ IndependentPrefixes  ;
@P.order.Cnj@ ConjunctPreverbs ;
@P.order.Cond@ ConditionalPreverbs ;
@P.order.Imp@ LexicalPreverbGate ;

LEXICON IndependentPrefixes
@D.class.II@@P.person.NI@0:@D.class.II@@P.person.NI@nit2 IndependentPrefixesBound ;
@D.class.II@@P.person.KI@0:@D.class.II@@P.person.KI@kit2 IndependentPrefixesBound ;
@P.person.NULL@ TensePreverbs ;
! ta- for only 3rd person forms (should the epenthetic form be -t(2)- or -(h)-?)
@P.person.NULL@PV/ta+:@P.person.NULL@ta  TensePreverbsBound ;
! (n|k)ohci-/(n|k)ôh- series
! nôh-/nohci-
@P.person.NI@PV/ôh+:@P.person.NI@n%<ôh       IndependentPreverbsBound ;
@P.person.NI@PV/ohci+:@P.person.NI@n%<ohci   IndependentPreverbsBound ;
! kôh-/kohci-
@P.person.KI@PV/ôh+:@P.person.KI@k%<ôh       IndependentPreverbsBound ;
@P.person.KI@PV/ohci+:@P.person.KI@k%<ohci   IndependentPreverbsBound ;
! ôh-/kohci-
@P.person.NULL@PV/ôh+:@P.person.NULL@ôh      IndependentPreverbsBound ;
@P.person.NULL@PV/ohci+:@U.person.NULL@ohci IndependentPreverbsBound ;
!! Hypotheticals
! nikâh-
@P.person.NI@PV/kâh+:@P.person.NI@ni%<kâh    IndependentPreverbsBound ;
! kikâh-
@P.person.KI@PV/kâh+:@P.person.KI@ki%<kâh    IndependentPreverbsBound ;
! kâh-
@P.person.NULL@PV/kâh+:@P.person.NULL@kâh   IndependentPreverbsBound ;
! nitâh-
@P.person.NI@PV/tâh+:@P.person.NI@ni%<tâh    IndependentPreverbsBound ;
! kitâh-
@P.person.KI@PV/tâh+:@P.person.KI@ki%<tâh    IndependentPreverbsBound ;
! tâh-
@P.person.NULL@PV/tâh+:@P.person.NULL@tâh    IndependentPreverbsBound ;


LEXICON IndependentPrefixesBound
0:%< TensePreverbs ;

LEXICON IndependentPreverbsBound
0:-%< TensePreverbs ;

LEXICON ConjunctPreverbs
PV/ê+:ê ConjunctPreverbsBound ;
PV/kâ+:kâ ConjunctPreverbsBound ;
PV/ta+:ta TensePreverbsBound ;
PV/ka+:ka TensePreverbsBound ;
@P.err.Morph@ TensePreverbs ;
IC+:^IC LexicalPreverbGate ;

LEXICON ConjunctPreverbsBound
0:-%< TensePreverbs ;

LEXICON ConditionalPreverbs
@P.conjunct.CC@IC+:@P.conjunct.CC@^IC LexicalPreverbGate ;
0 LexicalPreverbGate ;

LEXICON TensePreverbs
0 LexicalPreverbGate ;
PV/kî+:kî TensePreverbsBound ;
PV/wî+:wî TensePreverbsBound ;
PV/kî+PV/wî+:kî-%<wî TensePreverbsBound ;
@R.order.Ind@PV/ka+:@R.order.Ind@ka TensePreverbsBound ;

LEXICON TensePreverbsBound
0:-%< LexicalPreverbGate ;

LEXICON LexicalPreverbGate
0 Reduplication "weight: 10" ;
0 LexicalPreverbs "weight: 10" ;
0 ComitativePreverb "weight: 10" ;
0 VerbStems ;

LEXICON Reduplication
RdplW+:d2ay2 ReduplicationBound ;
RdplS+:d2âh  ReduplicationBound ;
RdplW+RdplS+:d2ay2-%<d2âh ReduplicationBound ;
@P.err.Morph@RdplS+RdplW+:@P.err.Morph@d2âh-%<d2ay2 ReduplicationBound ;

LEXICON ReduplicationBound
0:-%< LexicalPreverbs ;
0:-%< ComitativePreverb ;
0:-%< VerbStems ;

!! Here we take in the full list of lexical preverbs from affixes/preverbs.lexc
! LEXICON LexicalPreverbs
! PV/miyo+:miýo LexicalPreverbsBound ;

LEXICON ComitativePreverb
@R.class.AI@@D.comitative.COM@@P.comitative.COM@PV/wîci+:@R.class.AI@@D.comitative.COM@@P.comitative.COM@wî^COMt2 LexicalPreverbsBound ;
@R.class.TI@@D.comitative.COM@@P.comitative.COM@PV/wîci+:@R.class.TI@@D.comitative.COM@@P.comitative.COM@wî^COMt2 LexicalPreverbsBound ;

LEXICON LexicalPreverbsBound
0:-%< LexicalPreverbGate ;

! LEXICON ComitativePreverb
! @D.class.AI@@P.comitative.NULL@ VerbStems ;
! @R.class.AI@@P.comitative.NULL@ VerbStems ;
! @R.class.AI@@P.comitative.COM@PV/wîci+:@R.class.AI@@P.comitative.COM@wîci ComitativePreverbBound ;

! LEXICON ComitativePreverbBound
! 0:-%< VerbStems ;

LEXICON VerbStems
@R.class.II@ VII_Stems ;
@R.class.AI@ VAI_Stems ;
@R.class.TI@ VTI_Stems ;
@R.class.TA@ VTA_Stems ;
! Existential noun-to-verb derivations
@R.class.II@@P.exist.EXIST@ NounIndepStems ;
@R.class.AI@@P.exist.EXIST@ NounIndepStems ;
@R.class.AI@@P.poss.POSS@:@R.class.AI@@P.poss.POSS@ot2%< NounIndepStems ;
! Manufacture: N -> VAI with -îhke
@R.class.AI@@P.manuf.MANUF@ NounIndepStems ;
@R.class.AI@@P.manuf.MANUF@ NounDepNonkinshipStems ;
! Morphemic derivation of verb stems
@R.class.II@ MorphemicDerivation ;
@R.class.AI@ MorphemicDerivation ;
@R.class.TI@ MorphemicDerivation ;
@R.class.TA@ MorphemicDerivation ;
